Virginia statutes. Title 13.1. Corporations.
Article 1. General Provisions.

Research References.

Friend’s Virginia Pleading and Practice (Matthew Bender). Chapter 5 Parties. § 5.07 Specific Types of Parties — Various Actions. Friend.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender).
No. 12B-100. State Corporation Commission General Fee Schedule.

§ 13.1-1200.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known as the Virginia Business Trust Act.

History.

2002, c. 621.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2002, c. 621, cl. 3 provides: “That except as provided in the following sentence, the repeal of any provision of Chapter 9 (§§ 6.1-343 through 6.1-351) of Title 6.1 of the Code of Virginia by this act does not affect (i) the operation of such provision or any action taken under such provision before its repeal; (ii) any ratification, right, remedy, privilege, obligation or liability acquired, accrued, or incurred under such provision before its repeal; (iii) any violation of such provision, or any penalty, forfeiture or punishment incurred because of the violation, before its repeal; or (iv) any proceeding commenced, or reorganization or dissolution authorized by the trustees of a real estate investment trust under any such provision before its repeal, and the proceeding, reorganization or dissolution may be completed in accordance with such provision as if it had not been repealed. If a penalty or punishment imposed for violation of a provision repealed by this act is reduced by this act, the penalty or punishment if not already imposed shall be imposed in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

) of Title 13.1 as enacted by this act.”

Effective date.

This chapter became effective October 1, 2003.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

For article surveying developments in real estate and land use law in Virginia from June 1, 2001 through June 1, 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 271 (2002).

§ 13.1-1201.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“Articles of trust”
means all documents constituting, at any particular time, the articles of trust of a business trust. “Articles of trust” includes the original articles of trust, the original certificate of trust issued by the Commission, and all amendments to the articles of trust. When the articles of trust have been restated pursuant to any articles of amendment, the articles of trust includes only the restated articles of trust and any subsequent amendments to the restated articles of trust, but does not include the articles of amendment accompanying the restated articles of trust. When used with respect to a foreign business trust, the “articles of trust” of such entity means the document that is equivalent to the articles of trust of a domestic business trust.

“Beneficial owner”
means any owner of a beneficial interest in a business trust, the fact of ownership to be determined and evidenced, whether by means of registration, the issuance of certificates or otherwise, in conformity to the applicable provisions of the governing instrument of the business trust.

“Business trust”
or

“domestic business trust”

means an unincorporated business, trust, or association that:

Is governed by a governing instrument under which:

Property is or will be held, managed, administered, controlled, invested, reinvested, or operated by a trustee for the benefit of persons as are or may become entitled to a beneficial interest in the trust property; or

Business or professional activities for profit are carried on or will be carried on by one or more trustees for the benefit of persons as are or may become entitled to a beneficial interest in the trust property; and

A trust of the type known at common law as a “business trust” or “Massachusetts trust”;

A trust qualifying as a real estate mortgage investment conduit under § 860 D of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or under any successor provision;

A trust qualifying as a real estate investment trust under §§ 856 through 859 of the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or under any successor provision; or

A “real estate investment trust” or “trust” created under former Chapter 9 (§ 6-577 et seq.) of Title 6 or former Chapter 9 (§ 6.1-343 et seq.) of Title 6.1.

“Commission”
means the State Corporation Commission of Virginia.

“Domestic,”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of the Commonwealth.

“Domestic corporation”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Domestic limited partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.1

.

“Domestic nonstock corporation”
has the same meaning as “domestic corporation” as specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Domestic partnership”
means an association of two or more persons to carry on as co-owners a business for profit formed under §

50-73.88

, or predecessor law of the Commonwealth, and includes, for all purposes of the laws of the Commonwealth, a registered limited liability partnership.

“Domestic stock corporation”
has the same meaning as “domestic corporation” as specified in §

13.1-603

.

“Effective date,”
when referring to a document for which effectiveness is contingent upon issuance of a certificate by the Commission, means the time and date determined in accordance with §

13.1-1203

.

“Entity”
includes any domestic or foreign business trust or other business entity, any estate or trust, and any state, the United States, and any foreign government.

“Entity conversion”
means conversion. A certificate of entity conversion is the same as a certificate of conversion.

“Foreign”
with respect to an entity, means an entity governed as to its internal affairs by the organic law of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth.

“Foreign business trust”
means a trust formed under the law of a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth that would be a business trust if formed under the law of the Commonwealth.

“Foreign limited liability company”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Foreign limited partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.1

.

“Foreign nonstock corporation”
has the same meaning as “foreign corporation” as specified in §

13.1-803

.

“Governing instrument”
means a trust instrument that creates a business trust and provides for the governance of the affairs of the business trust and the conduct of its business, including, without limitation, a declaration of trust.

“Jurisdiction of formation” means the state or country the law of which includes the organic law governing a domestic or foreign business trust or other business entity.

“Organic law”
means the statute governing the internal affairs of a domestic or foreign business trust or other business entity.

“Other business entity”
means a domestic or foreign stock corporation, a nonstock corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or limited partnership.

“Person”
has the same meaning as specified in § 13.1-603.

“Protected series”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1002

.

“Registered limited liability partnership”
has the same meaning as specified in §

50-73.79

.

“State,”
when referring to a part of the United States, includes a state and commonwealth, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions; and a territory and insular possession, and their agencies and governmental subdivisions, of the United States.

“Trust”
includes a common law trust, business trust, and foreign business trust.

“Trust surrender”
has the same meaning as specified in §

13.1-1264

. A certificate of trust surrender is the same as a certificate of domestication.

“Trustee”
means a person appointed as a trustee in accordance with the governing instrument of a business trust. “Trustee” may include a beneficial owner of a business trust.

“United States”
includes any district, authority, bureau, commission, department, or other agency of the United States.

Files articles of trust under §

13.1-1212

.

“Business trust” includes, without limitation, any of the following entities that conform with subdivisions 1 and 2 of this definition:

History.

2002, c. 621; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487; 2022, c. 82.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 82 added the definitions of “Entity conversion” and “Trust surrender”; and made a stylistic change.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Banks and Banking, § 120.

§ 13.1-1202.
Filing requirements.

A document shall satisfy the requirements of this section, and of any other section that adds to or varies these requirements, to be entitled to be filed with the Commission.

The document shall be one that this chapter requires or permits to be filed with the Commission.

The document shall contain the information required by this chapter. It may also contain other information.

The document shall be typewritten or printed. The typewritten or printed portion shall be in black. Photocopies, or other reproduced copies, of typewritten or printed documents may be filed. In every case, information in the document shall be legible and the document shall be capable of being reformatted and reproduced in copies of archival quality.

The document shall be in the English language. A business trust name need not be in English if written in English letters or Arabic or Roman numerals. The articles of trust, duly authenticated by the official having custody of the applicable records in the state or other jurisdiction under whose law the business trust is formed, which are required of each foreign business trust, need not be in English if accompanied by a reasonably authenticated English translation.

The document shall be signed in the name of the domestic or foreign business trust:

By a trustee or by an officer of the business trust;

If the business trust has not been formed, by the person forming the business trust; or

If the business trust is in the hands of a receiver, trustee, or other court-appointed fiduciary, by that fiduciary.

The person executing the document shall sign it and state beneath or opposite his signature his name and the capacity in which he executes the document. Any signature may be a facsimile.

If, pursuant to any provision of this chapter, the Commission has prescribed a mandatory form for the document, the document shall be in or on the prescribed form.

The document shall be delivered to the Commission for filing and shall be accompanied by the required filing fee and any registration fee required by this chapter.

The Commission may accept the electronic filing of any information required or permitted to be filed by this chapter and may prescribe the methods of execution, recording, reproduction and certification of electronically filed information.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2013, c. 25.

Cross references.

As to execution and filing of articles of merger, see §

13.1-1261

.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25, in the introductory language of subsection F, substituted “signed” for “executed” and inserted “domestic or foreign.”

§ 13.1-1203.
Issuance of certificate by Commission; recordation of documents.

Whenever this chapter conditions the effectiveness of a document upon the issuance of a certificate by the Commission to evidence the effectiveness of the document, the Commission shall by order issue the certificate if it finds that the document complies with the provisions of this chapter and that all required fees have been paid. The Commission shall admit any such certificate to record in its office.

The existence of a business trust shall begin at the time the Commission issues a certificate of trust, unless a later date and time are specified as provided by subsection D. The certificate of trust shall be conclusive evidence that all conditions precedent required to be performed by the person or persons forming the business trust have been complied with and that the business trust has been formed under this chapter.

Whenever the Commission is directed to admit any document to record in its office, it shall cause it to be spread upon its record books or to be recorded or reproduced in any other manner the Commission may deem suitable. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Commission may furnish information from and provide access to any of its records by any means the Commission may deem suitable.

A certificate issued by the Commission is effective at the time such certificate is issued, unless the certificate relates to articles filed with the Commission and the articles state that the certificate shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the articles. In that event, the certificate shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or at 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the certificate is issued by the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified. Any other document filed with the Commission shall be effective when accepted for filing unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.
D. 1. A certificate issued by the Commission is effective at the time such certificate is issued, unless the certificate relates to articles filed with the Commission and the articles state that the certificate shall become effective at a later time or date specified in the articles. In that event, the certificate shall become effective at the earlier of the time and date so specified or at 11:59 p.m. on the fifteenth day after the date on which the certificate is issued by the Commission. If a delayed effective date is specified, but no time is specified, the effective time shall be 12:01 a.m. on the date specified. Any other document filed with the Commission shall be effective when accepted for filing unless otherwise provided for in this chapter.

Notwithstanding subdivision 1, any certificate that has a delayed effective time or date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, a statement of cancellation signed by each party to the articles to which the certificate relates is delivered to the Commission for filing. If the Commission finds that the statement of cancellation complies with the requirements of the law, it shall, by order, cancel the certificate.

A statement of cancellation shall contain:

The name of the business trust;

The name of the articles and the date on which the articles were filed with the Commission;

The time and date on which the Commission’s certificate becomes effective; and

A statement that the articles are being canceled in accordance with this section.

Notwithstanding subdivision 1, for purposes of §§

13.1-1214

and

13.1-1244

, any certificate that has a delayed effective date shall be deemed to be effective when the certificate is issued.

For articles with a delayed effective date and time, the effective date and time shall be Eastern Time.

The Commission shall have the power to act upon a petition filed by a business trust at any time to correct Commission records so as to eliminate the effects of clerical errors and of filings made by a person without authority to act for the business trust.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2013, c. 25; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487.

Cross references.

As to articles of domestication, see §

13.1-1268

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 4 provides: “That the provisions of this act (i) shall be applied prospectively only; (ii) shall not affect the validity of any filing made, or other action taken, prior to July 1, 2021, with respect to the name of a stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership; and (iii) shall not be construed to require any such stock corporation, nonstock corporation, limited liability company, business trust, or limited partnership that was in compliance with applicable laws regarding the distinguishability of its name prior to July 1, 2021, to change its name or take other action to comply with the requirements of this act.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25 deleted “of this subsection” following “subdivision 1” in subdivsions D 2 and D 3; and added subsection E.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, effective July 1, 2021, in subdivision D 1, substituted “or date” for “and date” and inserted the penultimate sentence; rewrote subdivision D 2, which read: “Notwithstanding subdivision 1, any certificate that has a delayed effective time and date shall not become effective if, prior to the effective time and date, the parties to the articles to which the certificate relates file a request for cancellation with the Commission, and the Commission, by order, cancels the certificate”; added subdivisions D 3 and 5; and redesignated former subdivision D 3 as subdivision D 4. For applicability clause, see Editor’s note.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

3A M.J. Banks and Banking, § 120.

§ 13.1-1204.
Fees for filing documents and issuing certificates.

The Commission shall charge and collect the following fees, except as provided in §

12.1-21.2

:

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $100:

Articles of trust.

An application for registration as a foreign business trust.

Articles of domestication.

Articles of entity conversion.

A copy of an instrument of merger of a foreign business trust referred to in §

13.1-1250

.

Articles of merger.

Articles of trust surrender.

A copy of an instrument of entity conversion of a foreign business trust holding a certificate of registration to transact business in the Commonwealth.

An application for a certificate of cancellation of a foreign business trust.

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $25:

For filing any one of the following, the fee shall be $10:

For issuing a certificate pursuant to §

13.1-1285

, the fee shall be $6.

a.

Articles of amendment.

b.

Articles of restatement.

c.

Articles of cancellation.

d.

Articles of correction referred to in §

13.1-1213

, a copy of an amendment or a correction referred to in §

13.1-1245

, or an amended application for registration referred to in §

13.1-1245

, provided that an amended application shall not require a separate fee when it is filed with a copy of an amendment or a correction referred to in § 13.1-1245.

a.

An application to reserve or to renew the reservation of a name for use by a domestic or foreign business trust.

b.

A notice of the transfer of a name reserved for use by a domestic or foreign business trust.

History.

2002, c. 621; 2003, c. 373; 2004, c. 274; 2007, c. 771; 2008, c. 101; 2012, c. 130; 2013, c. 25.

Cross references.

As to annual registration fees to be paid by domestic and foreign business trusts, see §

13.1-1252

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 487, cl. 3 provides: “That until July 1, 2023, the term ‘incorporation surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10 (§

13.1-801

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, the term ‘organization surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 12 (§

13.1-1000

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia, and the term ‘trust surrender’ when used in any provision of Chapter 14 (§

13.1-1200

et seq.) of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘domestication,’ and the term ‘entity conversion’ when used in any provision of Chapter 10, 12, or 14 of Title 13.1 of the Code of Virginia shall also be construed to mean ‘conversion.’ ”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 373, effective October 1, 2003, designated former subdivisions A to C as present subdivisions 1 to 3, designated former paragraphs A 1 to A 5 as present paragraphs 1 a to 1 e, designated former paragraphs B 1 to B 3 as present paragraphs 2 a, 2 c and 2 d, and designated former paragraphs C 1 and C 2 as present paragraphs 3 a and 3 b; in subdivision 2, substituted “$25” for “twenty-five dollars”; inserted subdivision 2 b; and in subdivision 3, substituted “$10” for “ten dollars.”

The 2004 amendments.

The 2004 amendment by c. 274 inserted “entity” in paragraph 1 e; and added paragraphs 2 g and 2 h.

The 2007 amendments.

The 2007 amendment by c. 771 added subdivision 4.

The 2008 amendments.

The 2008 amendment by c. 101, effective April 1, 2009, rewrote subdivision 2 d.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 130 added “except as provided in §

12.1-21.2

” at the end of the introductory paragraph; deleted “with respect to a domestic or foreign business trust” from the end of subdivision 2 c; and added subdivision 2 i.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 25 deleted subdivision 1 c, which read: “Articles of reinstatement” and redesignated the following subdivisions accordingly.

Law Review.

For article reviewing changes in Virginia corporate and business law from June 2001 through May 2002, see 37 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1 (2002).

§ 13.1-1205.
Unlawful to sign false documents; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to sign a document he knows is false in any material respect with intent that the document be delivered to the Commission for filing under this chapter.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2002, c. 621.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 13.1-1206.
Unlawful to transact or offer to transact business as a business trust; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any person to transact business in this Commonwealth as a business trust or to offer or advertise to transact business in this Commonwealth as a business trust unless the alleged business trust is either a domestic business trust or a foreign business trust authorized to transact business in this Commonwealth.

Any person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor.

History.

2002, c. 621.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 1 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

§ 13.1-1207.
Tax classification.

For purposes of any tax imposed by Title 58.1, a business trust shall be classified as a corporation, an association, a partnership, a trust, a real estate investment trust, a regulated investment company or otherwise, as shall be determined under the United States Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended, or under any successor provision.

History.

2002, c. 621.

§ 13.1-1208.
Separate legal entity.

A business trust established in accordance with the provisions of this chapter is a separate legal entity.

History.

2002, c. 621.